Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-278
Dissolution; right to wind up partnership affairs; powers.

(a) Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners or a person approved by the limited partners or, if there is more than one class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, but in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group as appropriate, may wind up the limited partnership's affairs; but the district court may wind up the limited partnership's affairs upon application of any partner or his or her legal representative or assignee and in connection with winding up such affairs may appoint a liquidating trustee.

(b) Upon dissolution of a limited partnership and until the filing of a certificate of cancellation as provided in section 67-242, the persons winding up the limited partnership's affairs may, in the name of and for and on behalf of the limited partnership, prosecute and defend suits, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, gradually settle and close the limited partnership's business, dispose of and convey the limited partnership's property, discharge the limited partnership's liabilities, and distribute to the partners any remaining assets of the limited partnership, all without affecting the liability of the limited partners.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 46;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 49.